Mongolian.aff
FLAG long
SFX C9 Y 28
SFX C9 0 нийд [шглмс]
SFX C9 ид дийнд ид
SFX C9 ин нийд ин
SFX C9 ир рийнд ир
SFX C9 ит тийнд ит
SFX C9 их хийнд их
SFX C9 иц цийнд иц
SFX C9 эв вийнд эв
SFX C9 эд дийнд эд
SFX C9 эн нийд эн
SFX C9 эр рийнд эр
SFX C9 эт тийнд эт
SFX C9 эх хийнд эх
SFX C9 эц цийнд эц
SFX C9 0 нийдээ [шглмс]
SFX C9 ид дийндээ ид
SFX C9 ин нийдээ ин
SFX C9 ир рийндээ ир
SFX C9 ит тийндээ ит
SFX C9 их хийндээ их
SFX C9 иц цийндээ иц
SFX C9 эв вийндээ эв
SFX C9 эд дийндээ эд
SFX C9 эн нийдээ эн
SFX C9 эр рийндээ эр
SFX C9 эт тийндээ эт
SFX C9 эх хийндээ эх
SFX C9 эц цийндээ эц

SFX D6 Y 18
SFX D6 0 ынд [врсбпф]
SFX D6 аж жийнд аж
SFX D6 ал лынд ал
SFX D6 ам мынд ам
SFX D6 ач чийнд ач
SFX D6 аш шийнд аш
SFX D6 ил лынд ил
SFX D6 им мынд им
SFX D6 ич чийнд ич
SFX D6 0 ындаа [врсбпф]
SFX D6 аж жийндаа аж
SFX D6 ал лындаа ал
SFX D6 ам мындаа ам
SFX D6 ач чийндаа ач
SFX D6 аш шийндаа аш
SFX D6 ил лындаа ил
SFX D6 им мындаа им
SFX D6 ич чийндаа ич

SFX D7 Y 18
SFX D7 0 ынд [врсбпф]
SFX D7 ил лынд ил
SFX D7 им мынд им
SFX D7 ич чийнд ич
SFX D7 ож жийнд ож
SFX D7 ол лынд ол
SFX D7 ом мынд ом
SFX D7 оч чийнд оч
SFX D7 ош шийнд ош
SFX D7 0 ындоо [врсбпф]
SFX D7 ил лындоо ил
SFX D7 им мындоо им
SFX D7 ич чийндоо ич
SFX D7 ож жийндоо ож
SFX D7 ол лындоо ол
SFX D7 ом мындоо ом
SFX D7 оч чийндоо оч
SFX D7 ош шийндоо ош

SFX D8 Y 18
SFX D8 0 ийнд [врсбпф]
SFX D8 ил лийнд ил
SFX D8 им мийнд им
SFX D8 ич чийнд ич
SFX D8 өж жийнд өж
SFX D8 өл лийнд өл
SFX D8 өм мийнд өм
SFX D8 өч чийнд өч
SFX D8 өш шийнд өш
SFX D8 0 ийндөө [врсбпф]
SFX D8 ил лийндөө ил
SFX D8 им мийндөө им
SFX D8 ич чийндөө ич
SFX D8 өж жийндөө өж
SFX D8 өл лийндөө өл
SFX D8 өм мийндөө өм
SFX D8 өч чийндөө өч
SFX D8 өш шийндөө өш

SFX D9 Y 18
SFX D9 0 ийнд [врсбпф]
SFX D9 ил лийнд ил
SFX D9 им мийнд им
SFX D9 ич чийнд ич
SFX D9 эж жийнд эж
SFX D9 эл лийнд эл
SFX D9 эм мийнд эм
SFX D9 эч чийнд эч
SFX D9 эш шийнд эш
SFX D9 0 ийндээ [врсбпф]
SFX D9 ил лийндээ ил
SFX D9 им мийндээ им
SFX D9 ич чийндээ ич
SFX D9 эж жийндээ эж
SFX D9 эл лийндээ эл
SFX D9 эм мийндээ эм
SFX D9 эч чийндээ эч
SFX D9 эш шийндээ эш

SFX E6 Y 12
SFX E6 0 ныд [ийеа]
SFX E6 ав вынд ав
SFX E6 аг гийнд аг
SFX E6 ас сынд ас
SFX E6 иг гийнд иг
SFX E6 ис сынд ис
SFX E6 0 ныдаа [ийеа]
SFX E6 ав вындаа ав
SFX E6 аг гийндаа аг
SFX E6 ас сындаа ас
SFX E6 иг гийндаа иг
SFX E6 ис сындаа ис

SFX E7 Y 12
SFX E7 0 ныд [ийео]
SFX E7 иг гийнд иг
SFX E7 ис сынд ис
SFX E7 ов вынд ов
SFX E7 ог гийнд ог
SFX E7 ос сынд ос
SFX E7 0 ныдоо [ийео]
SFX E7 иг гийндоо иг
SFX E7 ис сындоо ис
SFX E7 ов вындоо ов
SFX E7 ог гийндоо ог
SFX E7 ос сындоо ос

SFX E8 Y 10
SFX E8 иг гийнд иг
SFX E8 ис сийнд ис
SFX E8 өв вийнд өв
SFX E8 өг гийнд өг
SFX E8 өс сийнд өс
SFX E8 иг гийндөө иг
SFX E8 ис сийндөө ис
SFX E8 өв вийндөө өв
SFX E8 өг гийндөө өг
SFX E8 өс сийндөө өс

SFX E9 Y 12
SFX E9 0 нийд [ийеэ]
SFX E9 иг гийнд иг
SFX E9 ис сийнд ис
SFX E9 эв вийнд эв
SFX E9 эг гийнд эг
SFX E9 эс сийнд эс
SFX E9 0 нийдээ [ийеэ]
SFX E9 иг гийндээ иг
SFX E9 ис сийндээ ис
SFX E9 эв вийндээ эв
SFX E9 эг гийндээ эг
SFX E9 эс сийндээ эс
